North Dakota, session 69, HB1464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 23-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Postpartum doula certification.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Certified doula" means an individual who has received a certification to perform
doula services from the doulas of North America or an organization designated
by the department.
b. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
c. "Doula services" means education and support services for a parent and child,
including continuous emotional and physical support during the postpartum
period, including up to six months after the birth of the child.
2. The department may:
a. Designate additional doula certification organizations;
b. Remove the designation of a doula certification organization; and
c. Adopt rules to implement and administer this section.
3. The department shall establish criteria for the designation of doula certification
organizations and maintain a list of designated organizations on the department's
Page No. 1 25.0993.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
website for purposes of facilitating the availability of certified doulas to provide doula
services under section 2 of this Act .
4. The department may not impose a licensing or certification fee in addition to any fees
imposed by a doula certification organization meeting the criteria established by the
department.
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT - POSTPARTUM DOULA
CERTIFICATION. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of health and human services
shall provide a report to the legislative management regarding postpartum doula certification,
including the status of implementing and administering the responsibilities relating to
postpartum doula certification under section 1 of this Act and the impact of certified doula
services.
Page No. 2 25.0993.02000